Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5742XC (1) 91 lh/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 573.16, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. The public corporation, the principal contractor, 3 any claimant for labor or material who has filed a claim, 4 or the surety on any bond given for the performance of the 5 contract, may, at any time after the expiration of thirty days, 6 and not later than sixty days, following the completion and 7 final acceptance of said improvement, bring action in equity in 8 the county where the improvement is located to adjudicate all 9 rights to said fund, or to enforce liability on said bond. 10 b. No later than fourteen calendar days after final 11 acceptance of the improvement, the public corporation shall 12 send to the principal contractor, the surety on any bond given 13 for the performance of the contract, and any claimant for labor 14 or material who has filed a claim, a written notification of 15 the date of the public corporationâs final acceptance of the 16 improvement. The public corporation shall not be liable for 17 any claims or damages based on or arising out of the public 18 corporationâs failure to comply with this paragraph. 19